Hawaii statutes.
[§368-12] Notice of right to sue. The
commission may issue a notice of right to sue upon written request of the
complainant. Within ninety days after receipt of a notice of right to sue, the
complainant may bring a civil action under this chapter. The commission may
intervene in a civil action brought pursuant to this chapter if the case is of
general importance. [L 1989, c 386, pt of §1]

Case Notes

Plaintiff's claims not time-barred, where defendant argued
that certain claims were time-barred because plaintiff failed to serve
defendant with complaint within ninety days of receipt of right to sue letters
and that plaintiff had no intent to serve defendant with original complaint;
among other things, plaintiff filed complaint within ninety days of receipt of
right to sue letters and plaintiff was not also required to serve defendant
within ninety-day period, plaintiff was only required to commence the civil
action by filing complaint. 75 F. Supp. 2d 1113 (1999).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next